ro-RO: Soi de vin de gătit: Marsala; Roșu; Orez; Sherry; Alb; Altele
it: Varietà di vini da cucina: Marsala; Rosso; Riso; Sherry; Bianco; Altro
sv: Sort av matlagningsvin: Marsala; Rött; Ris; Sherry; Vitt; Övrigt
hu: Főzőbor fajtája: Marsala; Vörös; Rizs; Sherry; Fehér; Egyéb
fi: Ruoanlaittoviinien valikoima: Marsala; Punainen; Riisi; Sherry; Valkoinen; Muu
ko: 요리용 와인 종류: 마르살라; 레드; 쌀; 셰리; 화이트; 기타
th: ลักษณะไวน์สำหรับปรุงอาหาร: ไวน์มาร์ซาล่า; แดง; ข้าว; ไวน์เชอร์รี่; ขาว; อื่นๆ
tr: Pişirme Şarabı Çeşitleri: Marsala; Kırmızı; Pirinç; Şeri; Beyaz; Diğer
nb: Matvin-variant: Marsala; Rød; Ris; Sherry; Hvit; Annet
cs: Druh vína na vaření: Marsala; Červené; Rýže; Sherry; Bílé; Jiné
pt-PT: Variedade de vinhos de cozinha: Marsala; Tinto; Arroz; Xerez; Branco; Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta vina za kuhanje: Marsala; Crveno; Rižino; Sherry; Bijelo; Ostalo
nl: Kookwijnvariant: Marsala; Rood; Rijst; Sherry; Wit; Andere
sl-SI: Sorta vina za kuhanje: Marsala; Rdeče; Riževo; Sherry; Bela; Drugo
lt-LT: Vyno, skirto maistui gaminti, rūšis: Marsala; Raudonas; Ryžių; Cheresas; Baltas; Kita
es: Variedad de vinos para cocinar: Marsala; Rojo; Arroz; Jerez; Blanco; Otros
pl: Odmiana wina do gotowania: Marsala; Czerwony; Ryż; Sherry; Białe; Inne
da: Madlavningsvinsvariant: Marsala; Rød; Ris; Sherry; Hvid; Andet
vi: Loại rượu nấu ăn: Marsala; Vang đỏ; Gạo; Sherry; Vang trắng; Khác
el: Ποικιλία κρασιού μαγειρικής: Μαρσάλα; Κόκκινο; Ρύζι; Σέρυ; Λευκό; Άλλο
zh-TW: 料酒種類: 瑪薩拉酒; 紅; 米; 雪利酒; 白; 其他
zh-CN: 料酒品种: 马沙拉; 红酒; 大米; 雪莉酒; 白; 其他
pt-BR: Variedade de vinho para culinária: Marsala; Vermelho; Arroz; Xerez; Branco; Outro
en: Cooking wine variety: Marsala; Red; Rice; Sherry; White; Other
ru: Тип кулинарного вина: Марсала; Красный; Рис; Херес; Белый; Другое
de: Auswahl an Kochwein: Marsala; Rot; Reis; Sherry; Weiß; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Druhy vína na varenie: Marsala; Červený; Ryža; Sherry; Biely; Iné
fr: Variété de vin de cuisine: Marsala; Rouge; Riz; Vinaigre de xérès; Blanc; Autre
bg-BG: Сорт на вино за готвене: Марсала; Червено; Оризово; Шери; Бяло; Други
ja: クッキングワイン各種: マルサラ; レッド; 米; シェリー; ホワイト; その他